California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Complaints by Producers [56411. - 56415.]

56411.

For the purpose of enforcing this chapter, the director may receive verified complaints from producers or licensees against any person licensed pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 55401) or any person who acts or attempts to act as a licensee.

Upon receipt of any verified complaint, the director may make any and all necessary investigations relative to the complaint. The director shall, within 30 days, commence to investigate any verified complaint alleging that a licensee may be insolvent or in an unsound financial condition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 109, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

56412.

The director may administer oaths of verification on the complaints.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56413.

He shall have free and unimpeded access at all times to any building, yard, warehouse, or storage or transportation facility in which any farm product is kept, stored, handled, or transported.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56414.

He may do all of the following:

(a) Administer oaths and take testimony under oath.

(b) Issue subpoenas which require the attendance of witnesses before him, together with all books, memoranda, papers, and other documents, articles, or instruments.

(c) Compel the disclosure by such witnesses of all facts which are known to them relative to the matters under investigation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56415.

All parties disobeying the orders or subpoenas of the director are guilty of contempt and shall be certified to the superior court of the state for punishment for such contempt.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Investigations and Hearings [56441. - 56447.]

56441.

The director on his own motion may, or upon the verified complaint of any interested party shall, investigate, examine, or inspect any of the following:

(a) Any transaction which involves solicition, receipt, sale, or attempted sale of any farm product by any person that is acting or assuming to act as a licensee.

(b) Failure to make proper and true account of sales and settlement of sales as required by this chapter.

(c) The intentional making of false statements as to condition and quantity of any farm product which is received or in storage.

(d) The intentional making of false statements as to market conditions.

(e) The failure to make payment for any farm product within the time which is required by this chapter.

(f) Any and all other injurious transactions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------

56442.

In furtherance of any such investigation, examination, or inspection, the director may examine the ledgers, books, accounts, memoranda and other documents, farm products, scales, measures, and other articles and things which are used in connection with the business of the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------

56443.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 56444 or 56445, if the complaint is a bona fide dispute that involves any of the following, the department has no jurisdiction to act upon the complaint if the licensee or complainant, within 10 calendar days after receiving notice of the filing of the verified complaint, has notified the department of his or her election to submit the dispute to alternative dispute procedures in accordance with the provisions of a written contract:

(a) The rejection of any farm product.

(b) The failure or refusal to accept and pay for any farm product that is bought or contracted to be bought from a producer or by a licensee.

(c) The failure or refusal by the licensee to furnish or provide boxes or other containers, or hauling, harvesting, or any other services that are contracted to be done by the licensee in connection with the acceptance, harvesting, or other handling of the farm product.

(d) The terms and conditions of the written contract.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 72.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

56444.

The jurisdiction that is otherwise reserved to the department in this chapter is, however, restored for the purposes of this chapter if the authorities responsible for the alternative dispute procedures, without reasonable cause, fail, refuse, or neglect to adjudicate the matter in dispute within 90 days from the date of notification to the department.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

56445.

The department also has jurisdiction over any complaint or dispute if the licensee has failed to perform in accordance with any alternative dispute procedure award that is made in accordance with the terms of the written contract.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 76.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

56446.

Any verified complaint filed with the department pursuant to this chapter shall be filed not later than nine months from the date a complete account of sales was due.

This period, however, does not include the length of time it takes to secure a written letter of denial from the federal agencies responsible for administering the federal Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 181, et seq.) or the federal Perishable Agricultural Commodities Act, 1930 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 499a et seq.).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 56451 by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 82.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

56447.

If a licensee fails to pay farm products creditors for any farm product that is received on consignment from the creditors, or fails to pay farm products creditors for any farm product purchased from the creditors, the department shall ascertain the names and addresses of all farm products creditors of that licensee together with the amounts due and owing to them by the licensee, and shall request all those farm products creditors to file a verified statement of their respective claims with the department. The request shall be addressed to each known farm products creditor at his or her last known address.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 78.5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Contempt [56501. - 56503.]

56501.

If any person in any proceedings before the director disobeys or resists any lawful order, refuses to respond to a subpoena, refuses to take the oath or affirmation as a witness or thereafter refuses to be examined, or is guilty of misconduct during a hearing or so near the place of the hearing as to obstruct the proceeding, the director shall certify the facts to the superior court in and for the county where the proceedings are held.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56502.

The court shall thereupon issue an order which directs the person to appear before the court and show cause why he should not be punished as for contempt. The order and a copy of the certified statement shall be served on the person. Thereafter the court shall have jurisdiction of the matter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56503.

The same proceedings shall be had, the same penalties may be imposed and the person charged may purge himself of the contempt in the same way, as in the case of a person who has committed a contempt in the trial of a civil action before a superior court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Fees [56571. - 56576.]

56571.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this article or Section 55863, each applicant for a license shall pay to the department a fee in accordance with the schedule in subdivision (b), except that an agent shall pay one hundred dollars ($100) for each license period of the principal.

(b) The amount of the fee due each year shall be determined by the annual dollar volume of business based on farm product value returned to the grower or licensee, as follows:

(1) For a dollar volume of less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), the fee shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(2) For a dollar volume of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) and
 over, but less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the fee shall be three hundred fifty dollars ($350).

(3) For a dollar volume of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and over, but less than two million dollars ($2,000,000), the fee shall be four hundred fifty dollars ($450).

(4) For a dollar volume of two million dollars ($2,000,000) and over, but less than four million dollars ($4,000,000), the fee shall be five hundred fifty dollars ($550).

(5) For a dollar volume of four million dollars ($4,000,000) and over, the fee shall be six hundred fifty dollars ($650).

(c) The department may reevaluate the fee structure based on operating costs. The fees shall adequately cover the costs to fully administer and operate the program in an effective and efficient
 manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 80.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

56571.5.

The fees provided by Section 56571 are maximum fees. The secretary may fix those fees at a lesser amount, and may adjust those fees from time to time, whenever the secretary finds that the funds needed to administer this chapter must be adjusted for the sustainability of the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 603, Sec. 9.   (SB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

56572.

(a) (1) If any licensee does not apply for the renewal of a preexisting license on or before the date of the expiration of the license, a penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25) shall be added to the fee provided for under Section 56571 or 56571.5. That penalty shall be paid within 30 days immediately following the license expiration date . Payment of the penalty shall entitle the applicant to 60 days from the date of the penalty payment to complete the application. If the application is not completed within such time, the application shall be denied and all fees retained by the department.

(2) If the penalty described in paragraph (1) is not paid within the 30-day period, any application for renewal of a preexisting license shall be treated as a new application.

(b) A new applicant shall have 60 days from the date of filing the application form and payment of the fee to complete the application. After the 60-day period has elapsed, if the application remains incomplete, the application may be denied and the application fee retained by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 198, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

56573.5.

(a) If any person is found to be operating a business without the license required by Section 56181 or failed to pay the fee in accordance with the schedule in subdivision (b) of Section 56571, that person shall pay to the director double the amount of the license fee due pursuant to this chapter.

(b) In addition to subdivision (a), if any person is found to be operating a business within the past five years without a license required by Section 56181, or failed to pay the fees in accordance with the schedule in subdivision (b) of Section 56571, that person shall pay to the director an amount equal to that portion of the fees which were not paid for the last five years the business has operated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 662, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

56574.

Any person who has obtained a license pursuant to this chapter may secure a license pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 55401) by filing an application accompanied by a fee determined by the dollar volume of business based on farm product value returned to the grower, as follows:

(a) For a dollar volume of less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the fee shall be fifty dollars ($50).

(b) For a dollar volume of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and over, but less than two million dollars ($2,000,000), the fee shall be one hundred forty-five dollars ($145).

(c) For a dollar volume of two million dollars ($2,000,000) and over, the fee shall be two hundred dollars ($200).

This license shall be known as a “conjunctive license.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 537, Sec. 5.   Effective August 21, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

56574.5.

Any person who has applied for and obtained a license as agent, in the manner and upon the payment of the fee which is set forth in Section 56571, whose principal has applied for and obtained a conjunctive processor’s license, pursuant to Section 56574, shall be deemed to be licensed to represent his principal under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 55401) of this division, and no other fee shall be required of such agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 667.)
-------------------------------------------

56576.

All license fees which are collected pursuant to this chapter shall be paid into the State Treasury monthly and shall be credited to the Department of Agriculture Fund and, except as otherwise provided in Section 56133, shall be expended in carrying out this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18. Violations [56602. - 56623.]

56602.

It is a violation of this chapter if the applicant or licensee has made any fraudulent charges or returns for the handling, sale, or storage of, or for rendering any service in connection with the handling, sale, or storage of any farm product.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56603.

It is a violation of this chapter if the applicant, or licensee, has failed or refused to render a true account of sales, or to make a settlement on the sales, or to pay for any farm product which is received, within the time and in the manner which are required by this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56604.

It is a violation of this chapter if the applicant, or licensee, has made any false statement as to the condition, quality, or quantity of any farm product which is received, handled, sold, or stored by him.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56605.

It is a violation of this chapter if the applicant, or licensee, directly or indirectly, has purchased for his, or its, own account any farm product which is received by him upon consignment without prior authority from consignor together with the price fixed by the consignor or without promptly notifying the consignor of such purchase. This does not prevent any commission merchant from taking to account of sales, in order to close the day’s business, miscellaneous lots of parcels of any farm product which remains unsold, if such commission merchant forthwith enters such transaction on his account of sales.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56606.

It is a violation of this chapter if the applicant, or licensee, has intentionally made any false or misleading statement as to the conditions of the market for any farm product.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56607.

It is a violation of this chapter if the applicant or licensee has made any fictitious sale or has been guilty of collusion to defraud a producer or another licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

56608.

It is a violation of this chapter if a commission merchant to whom any consignment is made has reconsigned such consignment to another commission merchant or employed a broker to effect the sale for the consignor and has deducted more than one charge for effecting the sale without the written consent of the consignor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 96.)
-------------------------------------------

56609.

It is a violation of this chapter if the licensee was intentionally guilty of fraud or deception in the procurement of such license.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56610.

It is a violation of this chapter if the licensee or applicant has failed or refused to file with the director a schedule of his charges for services in connection with any farm product which is handled on account of, or as an agent of, another.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------

56611.

It is a violation of this chapter if the applicant, or licensee, has indulged in any unfair practice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56612.

It is a violation of this chapter if the licensee:

(a) Has rejected without reasonable cause or has failed or refused to accept without reasonable cause, any farm product which the licensee has bought or contracted to buy from another licensee or a producer.

(b) Has failed or refused without reasonable cause to provide boxes or other containers, or hauling, harvesting, or any other service which is contracted to be done by the licensee in connection with the acceptance, harvesting, or handling of such farm product.

(c) Has used any device to avoid acceptance or unreasonably defer acceptance of such farm product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

56613.

It is a violation of this chapter if the licensee has otherwise violated any provision of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56614.

It is a violation of this chapter if the licensee has knowingly employed an agent, without causing the agent to comply with the licensing requirements of this chapter which are applicable to agents.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56615.

It is a violation of this chapter if the applicant or licensee has in the handling of any farm product been guilty of fraud, deceit, or willful negligence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56616.

It is a violation of this chapter if the licensee has failed or refused, upon demand, to permit the director or his agents to make the investigations, examinations, or audits as provided in this chapter, or that the licensee has removed or sequestered any books, records, or papers which are necessary to any such investigations, examinations, or audits, or has otherwise obstructed them.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56617.

It is a violation of this chapter if the licensee without reasonable cause has failed or refused to execute or carry out a lawful contract with a producer or another licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

56618.

It is a violation of this chapter if the licensee has failed or refused to keep and maintain the records as required by this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56619.

It is a violation of this chapter if a dealer has obtained title to or possession, control, or delivery of any farm product from another licensee or a producer of the farm product without having executed a contract of purchase and sale, or a contract agreeing to purchase the farm product at a designated price to be paid by the dealer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

56619.5.

It is a violation of this chapter for a person licensed as a cash buyer to buy or otherwise take title to or possession of any farm product from a licensee or a producer of such product, except by cash payment of the full agreed price to the licensee or producer at the time of obtaining such possession or control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

56620.

Under a contract for the purchase or handling of any farm products, any delinquent payment of money under this chapter shall also include a late charge of 5 percent per month of the unpaid balance calculated on a daily basis for the period of the delinquency for the first month and an additional 1 percent per month of the unpaid balance calculated on a daily basis for the remaining period of the delinquency. Any such late charge shall be payable to the person from whom the farm product was purchased, unless the person waives, in writing, his right to such payment. Such waiver shall be valid and effective only when given after a delinquency has occurred.

This section does not affect the time of payment provided for in this chapter or in any contract for the purchase or handling of any farm product.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 400.)
-------------------------------------------

56621.

It is a violation of this chapter if a licensee fails, neglects, or refuses to collect or remit any assessments that have been levied in accordance with the assessment provisions of Article 10 (commencing with Section 58921) of Chapter 1 or Article 12 (commencing with Section 59941) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 21, or Article 8 (commencing with Section 64691) of Chapter 2, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 65500) of Part 2 of Division 22, Article 5 (commencing with Section 66621) of Chapter 4, Article 6 (commencing with Section 67101) of Chapter 5, Article 6 (commencing with Section 68101) of Chapter 6, Article 6 (commencing with Section 69081) of Chapter 7, Chapter 9.5 (commencing with Section 71000), Article 6 (commencing with Section 72101) of Chapter 10, Chapter 12.6 (commencing with Section 74701), Chapter 12.7 (commencing with Section 74801), Article 6 (commencing with Section 75131) of Chapter 13, Article 6 (commencing with Section 76141) of Chapter 14, Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 76201), Chapter 16.5 (commencing with Section 77001), Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 77201), Chapter 17.5 (commencing with Section 77401), Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 77701), Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 77901) of Article 6 (commencing with Section 78285) of Chapter 21, or Article 6 (commencing with Section 78700) of Chapter 24, of Part 2 of Division 22.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 768, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

56623.

It is a violation of this chapter if any commission merchant who collects or receives funds in connection with the sale of consigned farm products has made any use or disposition of these funds in his or her possession or control that endangers or impairs faithful and prompt payment to the consignor of the product or to any other person having a financial interest therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 942, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 19. Criminal Penalties [56631. - 56639.]

56631.

(a) Except as specified in Section 56632, any misdemeanor which is prescribed in this article is punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) or more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(b) For a violation of the offense described in subdivision (a), the department may recover investigative costs, excluding attorneys’ fees and administrative overhead, for those charges where there has been a conviction in a court of law, or a court-supervised settlement has been reached. Nothing in this section allows the department to recover investigative costs for an administrative licensing action or any action that has not been filed in a court of law.

(c) Any person or entity responsible for investigative costs under this section shall be allowed to audit the department’s investigative costs. The audit must be performed by a third-party certified public accountant and paid for by the person or entity requesting the audit. The department shall promulgate regulations to implement this subdivision by June 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 768, Sec. 9.5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

56632.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to assume or attempt to act, or to act, as a licensee or agent without a license and is punishable by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 942, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

56632.2.

It is a misdemeanor for any person subject to this chapter to pay license fees in an amount less than that amount established under subdivision (b) of Section 56571. Any person who pays less than the amount established under subdivision (b) of Section 56571 for two or more consecutive years shall pay to the director treble the amount of the license fees due pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 733, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

56632.5.

It is a misdemeanor for any person licensed as a cash buyer to buy or otherwise take title to, or possession of, any farm product from a licensee or a producer of such product, except by cash payment of the full agreed price to the licensee or producer at the time of obtaining possession or control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

56633.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to impose any false charge for handling or services in connection with any farm product.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56634.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to fail to account promptly, correctly, fully, and properly and to make settlement of accounts as provided in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56635.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to intentionally make any false or misleading statement as to market conditions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56636.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to make any fictitious sale or be guilty of collusion to defraud a producer or licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

56637.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to directly or indirectly purchase for his own account, goods which are received by him upon consignment without prior authority from the consignor, or to fail to promptly notify the consignor of such purchases, if any, on his own account. This section does not, however, prevent any commission merchant from taking to account of sales, in order to close the day’s business, any miscellaneous lot or parcel of any farm product which remains unsold, if such commission merchant forthwith enters such transaction on his account of sales.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56638.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to intentionally make any false statement regarding the grade, conditions, markings, quality, or quantity of any goods which are shipped or packed in any manner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56639.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to fail to comply in every respect with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 20. Civil Remedies and Penalties [56651. - 56652.]

56651.

The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation or the threatened violation of any provision of this chapter or of any order which is made pursuant to this chapter in the superior court in the county in which such violation occurs or is about to occur.

There may be enjoined in one proceeding any number of defendants that are alleged to be violating the same provisions or orders, although their properties, interests, residences, or places of business may be in several counties and the violations separate and distinct. Any proceeding which is brought pursuant to this section shall be governed in all other respects by the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525), Title 7, Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56652.

(a) Any person that violates any provision of this chapter is liable civilly in the sum of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each and every violation. This sum shall be recovered in an action by the secretary in any court of competent jurisdiction. All sums which are recovered pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(b) For a violation of the offense described in subdivision (a), the department may recover investigative costs, excluding attorneys’ fees and administrative overhead, for those charges where there has been a conviction in a court of law, or a court-supervised settlement has been reached. Nothing in this section allows the department to recover investigative costs for an administrative licensing action or any action that has not been filed in a court of law.

(c) Any person or entity responsible for investigative costs under this section shall be allowed to audit the department’s investigative costs. The audit must be performed by a third-party certified public accountant and paid for by the person or entity requesting the audit. The department shall promulgate regulations to implement this subdivision by June 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 768, Sec. 10.5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.2. Market Enforcement Advisory Committee [56701. - 56707.]

56701.

(a) The definitions set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 55401) of Chapter 6 apply to this chapter.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “committee” means the Market Enforcement Advisory Committee established pursuant to Section 56702.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 603, Sec. 10.   (SB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

56702.

(a) There is in the department a Market Enforcement Advisory Committee. The committee shall consist of up to 12 voting members, which shall include a balanced representation of growers, processors, and produce dealers, or representatives from organizations that advocate on behalf of these industry groups.

(b) The secretary shall appoint the members of the committee after receiving recommendations from the industry. In making appointments, the secretary shall ensure that there is representation on the board from a diverse population of industries, regions, business sizes, and farm product commodities.

(c) The secretary may appoint one additional member to the committee, from
 nominees received from the committee, who shall serve as the public member. The public member shall represent the interests of the public in all matters coming before the committee and shall have the same voting and other rights and immunities as other members of the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 603, Sec. 10.   (SB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

56703.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that persons appointed to the committee are intended to represent and further the interests of the industry concerned, and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are appointed to the committee, the industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 603, Sec. 10.   (SB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

56704.

(a) The term of office for a member of the committee is three years. If a vacancy exists, the secretary shall, consistent with the membership requirements described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 56702, appoint a replacement member of the committee for the duration of the term. The secretary may remove a committee member at any time.

(b) A member of the committee shall not receive a salary but may be reimbursed by the department for attendance at meetings and other committee activities authorized by the committee and approved by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 603, Sec. 10.   (SB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

56705.

(a) The committee shall advise the secretary and may make recommendations on all of the following:

(1) All matters pertaining to the administration and enforcement of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 55401) and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 56101) and any rules or regulations adopted pursuant to those chapters.

(2) Procedures established and performed by the Market Enforcement Branch of the department.

(3) Annual budgets required to accomplish the purposes of the chapters described in paragraph (1).

(4) The setting of appropriate licensing and
 complaint fees necessary for the administration of the chapters described in paragraph (1).

(b) The secretary may delegate additional advisory duties to the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 603, Sec. 10.   (SB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

56706.

(a) The committee shall annually elect a chair from its membership and, from time to time, other officers as it deems necessary.

(b) The committee shall meet at the call of its chair or the secretary. The committee shall meet at least once a year to review an annual budget and licensing fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 603, Sec. 10.   (SB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

56707.

Notwithstanding Section 11123 of the Government Code, the committee shall follow the teleconference requirements set forth in Section 58853 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 603, Sec. 10.   (SB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Produce Markets [56801. - 56982.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [56801. - 56810.]

56801.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56802.

“Association” means an association of produce dealers which is organized to carry out the responsibilities of produce dealers which are imposed by this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56803.

“City” includes city and county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56804.

“Commissioner,” with respect to any matter which relates to a particular market, means the deputy labor commissioner who is in charge of the office of the Labor Commissioner which is located nearest to that market.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56805.

“Director” means the Director of Industrial Relations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967.   Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56806.

“Farm product” means any fruit, nut, vegetable, berry, or aquacultural product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 810, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

56807.

“Market” means the places of business, collectively, of produce dealers that operate in a city, or the vicinity of a city, and that deal in any farm product which is intended, in whole or in part, for ultimate sale for consumption in a fresh state within the city and the vicinity of the city. This chapter applies only to markets in which five or more produce dealers operate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56808.

“Produce dealer” includes “commission merchant,” as defined in Section 56105, and “dealer,” as defined in Section 56107. It does not, however, include a “broker,” as defined in Section 56103, nor “processor,” as defined in Section 55407.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56809.

“Registered unloader” means a person who unloads any farm product in a market. It does not, however, include any of the following:

(a) A producer of farm products, or his or her son or daughter, father, mother, or regularly employed employee.

(b) The operator of any vehicle which is engaged in the transporation of any farm product to market if the operation of such vehicle is subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission and the rate which is charged for such transporation includes the charge for unloading the farm product which is so transported.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1171.)
-------------------------------------------

56810.

“Union” means the labor union which has been recognized by the National Labor Relations Board, or other governmental agency which has jurisdiction, as the bargaining agency for employees who are employed in a market.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [56831. - 56832.]

56831.

It is the purpose of this chapter to promote the orderly marketing of farm products and the establishment of reasonable charges for unloading such products at markets in this state. It is declared that in some of the markets of this state the charges for unloading farm products have been found to be exorbitant and unreasonable and that this chapter is enacted to remedy such evils and in the interests of the public welfare.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56832.

The director may make such regulations as he may deem necessary to carry out this chapter and to effectuate its purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exceptions [56861. - 56863.]

56861.

This chapter does not apply to any market in which less than five produce dealers operate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56862.

This chapter does not apply to any produce dealer at whose place of business every farm product which is delivered is unloaded without charge by employees of the produce dealer either with or without the assistance of the operator of the vehicle which transports such product or other persons who accompany the operator on such vehicle. This chapter does not prohibit any employee of a produce dealer from assisting in unloading any farm product without charge if registered unloaders are not available.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)